Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1311
Registered environmental health specialist; application for certification; continuing competency requirements.

An applicant for certification as a registered environmental health specialist who has met the education and examination requirements in section 38-1308, who passed the examination more than three years prior to the time of application for certification, and who is not practicing at the time of application for certification shall present proof satisfactory to the department that he or she has within the three years immediately preceding the application for certification completed continuing competency requirements approved by the board pursuant to section 38-145.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 532.